Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Aid to the Blind

71-4-101. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Aid to the Blind Law.”

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.57 (Williams, § 4765.75); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-501, 14-13-101.

71-4-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assistance” means money payments made to or in behalf of blind persons in need, or medical care, or both, including hospitalization, outpatient care and treatment, nursing home care, drugs or any other type of remedial care recognized under state law in behalf of blind persons in need, but does not include subdivisions (1)(A)-(1)(D) unless the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.), is amended to include one (1) or more of the following:

Any such payments to or care in behalf of any individual who is an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient in a medical institution, or any individual who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Any such payments to any individual who has been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis and is a patient in a medical institution as a result of having tuberculosis or psychosis;

Any such care in behalf of any individual, who is a patient in a medical institution as a result of a diagnosis that such person has tuberculosis or psychosis, with respect to any period after the individual has been a patient in such an institution as a result of such diagnosis, for forty-two (42) days; or

Is not an inmate of any private institution except such private institution as has been approved by the department at the time of receiving assistance;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Ophthalmologist” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state and who is actively engaged in the treatment of diseases of the human eye;

“Optometrist” means any person licensed to practice optometry in this state and holding a current certificate of registration;

“Recipient” means a person who was receiving aid to the blind benefits during the month of December, 1973, and is now qualified under Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally provided supplemental security income benefits; and

“Regional director” means the director of a region under chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 1; 1939, ch. 166, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.58 (Williams, § 4765.57); Acts 1951, ch. 194, § 1; 1957, ch. 117, § 21; 1965, ch. 16, § 1; 1973, ch. 337, § 4; 1974, ch. 628, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-502, 14-13-102.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 93-66, referred to in this section, may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

71-4-103. Blindness defined.

A person shall be considered “blind” for the purposes of this part whose vision, with correcting glasses, is so defective as to prevent the performance of activities for which eyesight is essential.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations stating, in terms of ophthalmic measurements, the amount of visual acuity that a recipient may have and still be eligible for assistance under this part.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.59 (Williams, § 4765.58); Acts 1974, ch. 628, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-503, 14-13-103.

71-4-104. Eligibility for assistance.

Assistance shall be granted under this part to any blind person who:

Is living within this state voluntarily and not for a temporary purpose, that is, with no intention of presently removing from the state; provided, that temporary absence from the state, with subsequent returns to the state or intent to return when the purposes of the absence have been accomplished, shall not, for the purpose of this part, interrupt continuity of residence;

Has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health, and whose spouse is not able to meet the person's needs as determined by the department's standards;

Is not an inmate of any public institution at the time of receiving assistance, nor of any private institution at the time of receiving assistance, except such private institution as has been approved by the department. An inmate of any institution may, however, make application for such assistance;

Within five (5) years immediately preceding application or during receipt of assistance, has not in order to evade any provision of this part made an assignment or transfer of property, the proceeds from which at the fair market value, irrespective of the actual consideration received, would under the state standards of need still be available to meet the needs of the individual. Any transfer of property to a husband, wife, son, daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother, sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew or niece, within the period above mentioned, shall be prima facie evidence that the transfer was made with the intent to evade the provisions of this part;

Is not receiving at the same time old-age assistance;

Shall not during the period of assistance refuse treatment if the examining ophthalmologist certifies that such treatment will restore, or partially restore, eyesight; or

Was receiving aid to the blind benefits during the month of December, 1973, and is now qualified under Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally-provided supplemental security income benefits.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 3; 1939, ch. 166, § 2; 1949, ch. 134, § 1; 1949, ch. 171, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.60 (Williams, § 4765.59); Acts 1951, ch. 233, § 1; 1955, ch. 32, § 1; 1955, ch. 168, § 1; 1957, ch. 81, § 4; 1957, ch. 116, § 3; 1965, ch. 16, § 2; 1967, ch. 63, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 370, § 1; 1972, ch. 506, § 3; 1974, ch. 628, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-504, 14-13-104.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 93-66, referred to in this section, may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

71-4-105. Determination of amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance that any person shall receive in the form of supplementary payments shall be determined by an application of 212 (a) of Public Law 93-66, and rules and regulations made by the department establishing standards of need and allowable resources to the recipient's present personal and economic circumstances.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 4; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.61 (Williams, § 4765.60); Acts 1951, ch. 79, § 1; 1953, ch. 9, § 1; 1957, ch. 117, § 22; 1961, ch. 29, § 1; 1965, ch. 16, § 3; 1967, ch. 63, § 3; 1973, ch. 303, § 24; 1974, ch. 628, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-505, 14-13-105.

Compiler's Notes. Section 212(a) of Public Law 93-66, referred to in this section, may be found in the notes following 42 U.S.C. § 1382.

71-4-106. Duties of department.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance to the needy blind under this part by the regional directors;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this part. All rules and regulations made by the department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective regional directors;

Establish standards for personnel employed by the department in the administration of this part and make necessary rules and regulations to maintain such standards;

Compile and supply to the regional director such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Cooperate with the commissioner of social security, or any federal officer or agency made successor to the commissioner of social security, in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for assistance to the needy blind and in conformity with this part, including the making of such reports in such forms and containing such information as the commissioner of social security may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as such commissioner may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary;

Designate a suitable number of ophthalmologists, duly licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee and actively engaged in the treatment of diseases of the human eye, or who are licensed, registered optometrists actively engaged in the practice of optometry in Tennessee, to examine recipients of assistance to the blind;

Fix the fees to be paid to ophthalmologists and optometrists for such examinations, such fees to be paid out of funds allocated to the department; and

Designate a suitable number of optometrists duly licensed to practice optometry in this state and holding a current certificate of registration to examine recipients of assistance to the blind; provided, that nothing in this part shall at any time be construed by any state or local agency as conferring upon the optometrist any rights or privileges with regard to the practice of optometry not specifically authorized under title 63, chapter 8.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 5; 1943, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.62 (Williams, § 4765.61); Acts 1951, ch. 194, §§ 2-6; modified; Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 25; 1974, ch. 628, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-507, 14-13-106.

71-4-107. Duties of regional directors.

The regional directors shall administer this part in the counties of their regions, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the department, and shall report to the department at such times and in such manner as it may direct.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.63 (Williams, § 4765.62); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-508, 14-13-107.

71-4-108. Appeal to department.

If any award of assistance is modified or cancelled under any provision of this part, the recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by it.

The department shall, upon receipt of such an appeal, give the recipient reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 10; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.67 (Williams, § 4765.66); Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 27; 1974, ch. 628, § 18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-514, 14-13-108.

71-4-109. Finality of department decisions.

All decisions of the department shall be final and shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the regional director or a designated agent.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 10; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.67 (Williams, § 4765.66); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-516, 14-13-109.

71-4-110. Reinvestigation of awards.

All assistance grants in the form of money payments made under this part shall be reconsidered by the regional director or a designated agent as frequently as may be required by the rules of the department.

After such further investigation as the regional director or a designated agent may deem necessary or the department may require, the amount of assistance in the form of money payments may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the recipient's circumstances have altered to warrant such action.

A recipient shall submit to a reexamination as to eyesight when required to do so by the regional director or a designated agent or the department. Such recipient shall also furnish any information required by the regional director or a designated agent or by the department.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 11; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.68 (Williams, § 4765.67); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 25; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-517, 14-13-110.

71-4-111. Change in property or income of recipient.

If, at any time during the continuance of assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the amount stated in the application, it shall be the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the regional director or a designated agent of the receipt or possession of such property or income.

The regional director or a designated agent may, after investigation, either cancel the assistance or alter the amount of the money payment in accordance with the circumstances.

Any assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of such property or income and in excess of the recipient's need as determined by the department's standards shall be recoverable in a suit by the state as a debt due to the state.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 12; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.69 (Williams, § 4765.68); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 26; 1961, ch. 11, § 1; 1974, ch. 628, § 19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-518, 14-13-111.

71-4-112. Removal of recipient from county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled, with the approval of the department, to receive assistance in the county to which the recipient has moved, and the regional director or a designated agent of the county from which the recipient has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the regional director or a designated agent of the county to which the recipient has moved.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 14; 1945, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.71 (Williams, § 4765.70); Acts 1951, ch. 162, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-519, 14-13-112.

71-4-113. Amendment of law.

All assistance granted under this part shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing statute that may hereafter be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of the recipient's assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing statute.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.77 (Williams, § 4765.74); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-520, 14-13-113.

71-4-114. Charging for assistance to applicants.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to directly or indirectly either charge or receive anything of value for assisting any person in making application to the proper authorities of this state, or any of them, for relief or assistance under any statutes of this state providing for financial assistance to the needy blind.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 118, § 1; 1941, ch. 41, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.78 (Williams, § 4765.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-521, 14-13-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-4-115. Unlawful use of lists.

Except as permitted by §§ 71-1-117 and 71-1-118, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any list or names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving aid to the blind, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1941, ch. 148, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.78 (Williams, § 11412.7); impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-522, 14-13-115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-4-116. Fraudulent devices.

A person who knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any person to obtain by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device, assistance to which such person is not entitled or assistance greater than that to which such person is justly entitled, or whoever with intent to defraud aids or abets in buying or in any way disposing of the property, either personal or real, of a recipient of assistance without the consent of the department, commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.76 (Williams, § 4765.73); Acts 1955, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-523, 14-13-116; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 105.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

71-4-117. Assignment of benefits — Exemption.

Assistance granted under this part shall not be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this part shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Acts 1937, ch. 51, § 9; 1937, ch. 51, § 20-a, as added by Acts 1941, ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.66 (Williams, §§ 4765.65, 4765.74a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-524, 14-13-117.

Law Reviews.

Exempt Property in Tennessee under the Bankruptcy Code (Thomas E. Ray), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1982).

71-4-118. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.